Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.570

Support of reading and early literacy.

In support of reading and early literacy, the office of the superintendent of public instruction is responsible for:

(1) Continuing to work collaboratively with state and regional partners such as the department of children, youth, and families and the educational service districts to establish early literacy benchmarks and standards and to implement the Washington state comprehensive literacy plan;

(2) Disseminating research and information to school districts about evidence-based programs and practices in reading readiness skills, early literacy, and reading instruction;

(3) Providing statewide models to support school districts that are implementing response to intervention initiatives, positive behavior intervention support systems, or other similar comprehensive models of data-based identification and early intervention; and

(4) Within available funds and in partnership with the educational service districts, providing technical assistance and professional development opportunities for school districts.

[ 2018 c 58 s 29; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 101.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.